North Carolina, session 2025, HB915.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-151.29 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
repeal, is recodified as G.S. 105-153.12, and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.12. Credit for qualifying expenses of a production company.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Highly compensated individual. – An individual who directly or indirectly
receives compensation in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) for
personal services with respect to a single production. An individual receives
compensation indirectly when a production company pays a personal service
company or an employee leasing company that pays the individual.
(2) Live sporting event. – A scheduled sporting competition, game, or race that is
not originated by a production company, but originated solely by an amateur,
collegiate, or professional organization, institution, or association for live or
tape-delayed television or satellite broadcast. A live sporting event does not
include commercial advertising, an episodic television series, a television
pilot, a music video, a motion picture, or a documentary production in which
sporting events are presented through archived historical footage or similar
footage taken at least 30 days before it is used.
(3) Production company. – Defined in G.S. 105-164.3.
(4) Qualifying expenses. – The sum of the following amounts spent in this State
by a production company in connection with a production, less the amount
paid in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000) to a highly compensated
individual:
a. Goods and services leased or purchased. For goods with a purchase
price of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more, the amount
included in qualifying expenses is the purchase price less the fair
market value of the good at the time the production is completed.
b. Compensation and wages on which withholding payments are remitted
to the Department of Revenue under Article 4A of this Chapter.
c. The cost of production-related insurance coverage obtained on the
production. Expenses for insurance coverage purchased from a related
member are not qualifying expenses.
*H915-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
d. Employee fringe contributions, including health, pension, and welfare
contributions.
e. Per diems, stipends, and living allowances paid for work being
performed in this State.
(5) Related member. – Defined in G.S. 105-130.7A.
(b) Credit. – A taxpayer that is a production company and has qualifying expenses of at
least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) with respect to a production is allowed a
credit against the taxes imposed by this Part equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the production
company's qualifying expenses. For the purposes of this section, in the case of an episodic
television series, an entire season of episodes is one production. The credit is computed based on
all of the taxpayer's qualifying expenses incurred with respect to the production, not just the
qualifying expenses incurred during the taxable year.
(b1) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-529, s. 2, effective January 1, 2011.
(c) Pass-Through Entity. – Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 105-131.8 and
G.S. 105-269.15, a pass-through entity that qualifies for a credit provided in this section does not
distribute the credit among any of its owners. The pass-through entity is considered the taxpayer
for purposes of claiming a credit allowed by this section. If a return filed by a pass-through entity
indicates that the entity is paying tax on behalf of the owners of the entity, a credit allowed under
this section does not affect the entity's payment of tax on behalf of its owners.
(d) Return. – A taxpayer may claim a credit allowed by this section on a return filed for
the taxable year in which the production activities are completed. The return must state the name
of the production, a description of the production, and a detailed accounting of the qualifying
expenses with respect to which a credit is claimed. The qualifying expenses are subject to audit
by the Secretary before the credit is allowed.
(e) Credit Refundable. – If a credit allowed by this section exceeds the amount of tax
imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, the Secretary
must refund the excess to the taxpayer. The refundable excess is governed by the provisions
governing a refund of an overpayment by the taxpayer of the tax imposed in this Part. In
computing the amount of tax against which multiple credits are allowed, nonrefundable credits
are subtracted before refundable credits.
(f) Limitations. – The amount of credit allowed under this section with respect to a
production that is a feature film may not exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000). No credit
is allowed under this section for any production that satisfies one of the following conditions:
(1) It is political advertising.
(2) It is a television production of a news program or live sporting event.
(3) It contains material that is obscene, as defined in G.S. 14-190.1.
(4) It is a radio production.
(g) Substantiation. – A taxpayer allowed a credit under this section must maintain and
make available for inspection any information or records required by the Secretary of Revenue.
The taxpayer has the burden of proving eligibility for a credit and the amount of the credit. The
Secretary may consult with the North Carolina Film Office of the Department of Commerce and
the regional film commissions in order to determine the amount of qualifying expenses.
(h) Report. – The Department must include in the economic incentives report required by
G.S. 105-256 the following information itemized by taxpayer:
(1) The location of sites used in a production for which a credit was taken.
(2) The qualifying expenses for which a credit was taken, classified by whether
the expenses were for goods, services, or compensation paid by the production
company.
(3) The number of people employed in the State with respect to credits taken.
(4) The total cost to the General Fund of the credits taken.
Page 2 House Bill 915-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(i) Repealed by Session Laws 2006-220, s. 4, effective for taxable years beginning on
and after January 1, 2007.
(j) NC Film Office. – To claim a credit under this section, a taxpayer must notify the
Division of Tourism, Film, and Sports Development in the Department of Commerce of the
taxpayer's intent to claim the production tax credit. The notification must include the title of the
production, the name of the production company, a financial contact for the production company,
the proposed dates on which the production company plans to begin filming the production, and
any other information required by the Division. For productions that have production credits, a
taxpayer claiming a credit under this section must acknowledge in the production credits both
the North Carolina Film Office and the regional film office responsible for the geographic area
in which the filming of the production occurred.
(k) Sunset. – This section is repealed for qualifying expenses occurring on or after
January 1, 2015."
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-130.47 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its repeal
and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-130.47. Credit for qualifying expenses of a production company.
…
(k) Sunset. – This section is repealed for qualifying expenses occurring on or after
January 1, 2015."
SECTION 3. This act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1,
2025, and applies to qualifying expenses occurring on or after that date.
House Bill 915-First Edition Page 3